Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-412
Designation of successor in interest; rights; notice of election to operate franchise.

A franchisee may designate one primary and one alternate successor in interest. The alternate, if one is designated, shall have no rights under sections 87-411 to 87-414 if the primary successor in interest exercises his or her rights under sections 87-411 to 87-414. If an alternate desires to assume and operate the franchise in the event the primary successor in interest fails to do so, the alternate shall give notice of such election within forty-five days after the death of the franchisee and shall comply with sections 87-411 to 87-414.

Laws 1985, LB 700, § 2.